test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-kimdwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Numeral - kimdõz: # quantifiers 163 'eng /est kümnes/fin' - full paradigm
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: kimdõz
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen: kimdõnd
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Par: kimdõndt
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Dat: kimdõndõn
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ins: kimdõndõks
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill: kimdõndõ
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela: kimdõndõst
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom: kimdõndõd
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen: kimdõndõd
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Par: kimdõndidi
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Dat: kimdõndõdõn
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ins: kimdõndõdõks
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill: kimdõndiž
     kimdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela: kimdõndist
